Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-8,105
Interstate bridges; construction and maintenance; contracts; letting; procedure.

All contracts let by the department for construction or maintenance upon any interstate bridge, except contracts for emergency maintenance, whether let pursuant to an agreement between the department and an adjoining state, or otherwise, shall be let in the same manner and under the same conditions provided by sections 39-1348 to 39-1354.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 15, p. 639.